Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.40.090

Luring.

(1) A person commits the crime of luring if the person, with the intent to harm the health, safety, or welfare of the minor or person with a developmental disability or with the intent to facilitate the commission of any crime:

(a) Orders, lures, or attempts to lure a minor or a person with a developmental disability into any area or structure that is obscured from or inaccessible to the public, or away from any area or structure constituting a bus terminal, airport terminal, or other transportation terminal, or into a motor vehicle;

(b) Does not have the consent of the minor's parent or guardian or of the guardian of the person with a developmental disability; and

(c) Is unknown to the child or developmentally disabled person.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Minor" means a person under the age of sixteen;

(b) "Person with a developmental disability" means a person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

(3) Luring is a class C felony.

[ 2016 c 11 s 1; 2012 c 145 s 1; 1995 c 156 s 1; 1993 c 509 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 145: "This act takes effect January 1, 2013." [ 2012 c 145 s 2.]